Wyoming, session 2025, HB0295.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

(a) The legislature finds that:

HB0295

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0327
(i) The legislature has a duty to promote the
diversification of the economy of the state of Wyoming;

(ii) There is a need to foster the development
of domestic and intrastate enterprises that support
economic diversification;

(iii) Economic diversification is directly
correlated to the sovereignty of the state of Wyoming;

(iv) Fiscal stability is a paramount and
critical aspect of that sovereignty;

(v) Wyoming funds are presently and primarily
managed by interstate investment managers;

(vi) The legislature desires to see Wyoming
funds be managed by Wyoming investment managers in order to
diversify and grow the Wyoming economy.

Section 2. W.S. 9-4-722 is created to read:

9-4-722. Intrastate investment manager program.
HB0295

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0327

(a) The invest in Wyoming program is hereby created.
This section may be cited as the Wyoming intrastate
investment manager program.

(b) Not later than August 1 of each year, the state
treasurer shall prepare a current list of all intrastate
investment managers. The list shall also include whether
each listed intrastate investment manager complies with the
conditions specified W.S. 9-4-718 and the specific
conditions listed in W.S. 9-4-718 that each listed
intrastate investment manager fails to meet, if applicable.
The state treasurer shall publish this list on the public
website of the state treasurer.

(c) The state treasurer shall contract with
intrastate investment managers in accordance with this
section. Intrastate investment managers shall be selected
based upon a qualification process and with consideration
given to the historical performance of the intrastate
investment managers. No intrastate investment manager shall
be selected unless approved by a majority vote of the board
and in consultation with the investment funds committee.
HB0295

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0327
Any contract with an intrastate investment manager may be
terminated by a majority vote of the board. Before
selection under this section, each intrastate investment
manager shall provide sufficient evidence as required by
the board to satisfactorily demonstrate that the intrastate
investment manager is not an office, extension or alter ego
for an interstate investment manager or company. No
intrastate investment manager shall be selected under this
section unless:

(i) The intrastate investment manager first
submits audited financial statements, in accordance with
rules promulgated by the state treasurer, and a certified
record of past investment performance prepared by an
independent entity;

(ii) The intrastate investment manager is or has
at least one (1) employee who is, prior to the execution of
a contract, certified or licensed by the financial industry
regulatory authority;

HB0295

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0327
(iii) The intrastate investment manager has,
prior to the execution of a contract, at least one (1) of
the following:

(A) A verifiable chartered financial
analyst institute compliant track record of not less than
two (2) years with respect to the type of investments for
which the intrastate investment manager will provide
services;

(B) Been employed by an organized and
chartered trust company with trust assets in excess of one
million dollars ($1,000,000.00).

(d) Investment managers selected under this section
shall be responsible for the investment of not less than
three percent (3%) and not more than five percent (5%) of
permanent funds authorized for investment under W.S.
9-4-715(n).

(e) The amount of state funds under contract with any
one (1) intrastate investment manager shall not exceed ten
percent (10%) of the total assets managed by that
HB0295

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0327
intrastate investment manager before entering into a
contract for the investment of state funds.

(f) Intrastate investment managers shall be paid on a
negotiated flat fee or performance basis based upon net
assets invested.

(g) Contracts with intrastate investment managers
under this section shall be subject to cancellation upon
receipt of notice of not less than thirty (30) days from
either party.

(h) Each intrastate investment manager investing
state funds and selected under this section shall, at least
one (1) time every calendar quarter, provide a report to
the state treasurer and the board describing the intrastate
investment manager's performance relative to mutually
agreed-upon industry benchmark indices and that reflects
all brokerage fees, other fees and expenses paid by or fees
earned by the intrastate investment manager that are paid
by the state.

HB0295

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0327
(j) The provisions of W.S. 9-4-718 that conflict with
this section shall not apply to the selection of intrastate
investment managers under this section.

(k) Intrastate investment managers selected to invest
funds under this section shall comply with the applicable
investment policy statements adopted under W.S. 9-4-716.

Section 3. W.S. 9-4-714(a) by creating new paragraphs
(viii) and (ix) and by amending and renumbering (viii) as
(x) and 9-4-718(a)(intro) and by creating a new subsection
(d) are amended to read:

9-4-714. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(viii) "Interstate investment manager" means any
other person or entity that is legally permitted to act as
an investment manager but is not an intrastate investment
manager;

HB0295

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0327
(ix) "Intrastate investment manager" means an
investment adviser registered under the federal Investment
Advisor's Act of 1940, as amended that:

(A) Is a firm residing in the state of
Wyoming or a legal entity of the state of Wyoming under
majority control of at least one (1) individual person in
Wyoming who is certified or licensed by the financial
industry regulatory authority;

(B) Maintains a principal place of business
within the state of Wyoming; and

(C) Employs at least two (2) professionals
at a physical place of business in Wyoming.

(viii)(x) "This act" means W.S. 9-4-714 through
9-4-721 9-4-722.

9-4-718. Investment managers.

(a) Subject to subsection (e) of this section and
W.S. 9-4-722, the state treasurer may contract with
HB0295

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0327
investment managers and pay for investment services and
investment advice subject to the following conditions:

(d) The state treasurer may contract with interstate
investment managers and intrastate investment managers in
accordance with this section. Intrastate investment
managers meeting the requirements of W.S. 9-4-722 and
subject to the investment requirements of W.S. 9-4-722
shall not be subject to this section to the extent that
this section conflicts with W.S. 9-4-722.

Section 4. Nothing in this act shall be construed to
alter or impair any contract or agreement entered into
before July 1, 2025.

Section 5. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0295